Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.033

Operation of the Washington state combined fund drive—Secretary of state—Rules.

The secretary of state is authorized to adopt rules, after consultation with state agencies, institutions of higher education, and employee organizations for the operation of the Washington state combined fund drive.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 9; 2010 c 101 s 1; 2003 c 205 s 1; 2002 c 61 s 4.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2010 c 101 s 1 and by 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 9, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.